Utah statutes.
53-2a-1006.   Curtailment of energy use -- Standby priorities -- Restriction on involuntary curtailment.

In consultation with appropriate federal and state officials and officials of political subdivisions in this state, the governor shall cause to be established, and revised as appropriate, standby priorities for curtailment in the use of energy resources.  Involuntary curtailments, however, may be ordered only by means of executive orders issued pursuant to this part.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 295, 2013 General Session

